Hawaii statutes.
§437D-3 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Advertisement" means any oral,
written, graphic, or pictorial statement or representation, including those
made through any electronic or print medium. "Advertisement" does
not include telephonic communications.

"Damage waiver" means any contract or
contractual provision, whether separate from or a part of a rental agreement,
whereby the lessor agrees, for a charge, to waive any or all claims against the
lessee for any damages to the rental motor vehicle during the term of the
rental agreement.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Lessee" means any person obtaining
the use of a rental motor vehicle from a lessor for a period of six months or
less under the terms of a rental agreement.

"Lessor" means any person in the
business of providing rental motor vehicles to the public.

"Plain language" means language
written or spoken in a clear and coherent manner using words with common and
everyday meanings.

"Rental agreement" means any written
agreement setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of the
rental motor vehicle by the lessee.

"Rental cost" means the daily or
periodic rate charged for the use of the rental motor vehicle, but does not
include optional or refueling charges.

"Rental motor vehicle" or
"vehicle" means a motor vehicle as defined in section 286-2, which is
rented or leased or offered for rent or lease in this State, whether for
personal or commercial use, for a period of six months or less. [L 1988, c 251,
pt of §2; am L 2009, c 148, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next